Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB433.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 632(b) and (d) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, are amended to read:Section 632. Coverage for Mammographic Examinations and Breast Imaging.--* * *<--1234567891011121314151617181920 SECTION 1. SECTION 632 OF THE ACT OF MAY 17, 1921 (P.L.682, NO.284), KNOWN AS THE INSURANCE COMPANY LAW OF 1921, IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 632. COVERAGE FOR MAMMOGRAPHIC EXAMINATIONS AND BREAST IMAGING.--[(A) ALL GROUP OR INDIVIDUAL HEALTH OR SICKNESS OR ACCIDENT INSURANCE POLICIES PROVIDING HOSPITAL OR MEDICAL/SURGICAL COVERAGE AND ALL GROUP OR INDIVIDUAL SUBSCRIBER CONTRACTS OR CERTIFICATES ISSUED BY ANY ENTITY SUBJECT TO 40 PA.C.S. CH. 61 (RELATING TO HOSPITAL PLAN CORPORATIONS) OR 63 (RELATING TO PROFESSIONAL HEALTH SERVICES PLAN CORPORATIONS), THIS ACT, THE ACT OF DECEMBER 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, NO.364), KNOWN AS THE "HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION ACT," THE ACT OF JULY 29, 1977 (P.L.105, NO.38), KNOWN AS THE "FRATERNAL BENEFIT SOCIETY CODE," OR AN EMPLOYE WELFARE BENEFIT PLAN AS DEFINED IN SECTION 3 OF THE EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT INCOME SECURITY ACT OF 1974 (PUBLIC LAW 93-406, 29 U.S.C. § 1001 ET SEQ.) PROVIDING HOSPITAL OR MEDICAL/SURGICAL COVERAGE SHALL ALSO] A HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY OFFERED, ISSUED OR RENEWED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR MAMMOGRAPHIC EXAMINATIONS. THE MINIMUM COVERAGE REQUIRED SHALL INCLUDE ALL COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH A MAMMOGRAM EVERY YEAR FOR [WOMEN] INDIVIDUALS 40 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER, WITH ANY MAMMOGRAM BASED ON A PHYSICIAN'S RECOMMENDATION FOR [WOMEN] INDIVIDUALS UNDER 40 YEARS OF AGE. PRIOR TO PAYMENT FOR A SCREENING MAMMOGRAM, INSURERS SHALL VERIFY THAT THE SCREENING MAMMOGRAPHY SERVICE PROVIDER IS PROPERLY LICENSED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE ACT OF JULY 9, 1992 (P.L.449, NO.93), KNOWN AS THE "MAMMOGRAPHY QUALITY ASSURANCE ACT." NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE AN INSURER TO COVER THE SURGICAL PROCEDURE KNOWN AS MASTECTOMY OR TO PREVENT APPLICATION OF DEDUCTIBLE OR COPAYMENT PROVISIONS 20250HB0433PN1300 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONTAINED IN THE POLICY OR PLAN EXCEPT AS PREEMPTED BY FEDERAL LAW.(b) [A group or individual health or sickness or accident insurance policy providing hospital or medical/surgical coverage and a group or individual subscriber contract or certificate issued by any entity subject to Article XXIV, 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 or 63, this act, the ["Health Maintenance Organization Act," the "Fraternal Benefit Society Code"] "Health Maintenance Organization Act" or an employe welfare benefit plan as defined in section 3 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 providing hospital or medical/surgical coverage] A HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY OFFERED, ISSUED OR RENEWED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH shall also provide coverage for breast imaging. The minimum coverage required shall include all costs associated with [one] diagnostic breast examinations that are used to evaluate a seen or suspected abnormality from a screening examination for breast cancer or used to evaluate an abnormality detected by another means of examination. The minimum coverage REQUIRED shall also include all costs associated with supplemental breast [screening every year] screenings because the [woman] person INDIVIDUAL is believed to be at an increased risk of breast cancer due to:(1) personal history of atypical breast histologies;(2) personal history or family history of breast cancer;(3) genetic predisposition for breast cancer;(4) prior therapeutic thoracic radiation therapy;(5) heterogeneously dense breast tissue based on breast composition categories with any one of the following risk factors:(i) lifetime risk of breast cancer of greater than 20%, according to risk assessment tools based on family history;20250HB0433PN1300 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) personal history of BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene mutations;(iii) first-degree relative with a BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene mutation but not having had genetic testing herself;(iv) prior therapeutic thoracic radiation therapy between 10 and 30 years of age; or(v) personal history of Li-Fraumeni syndrome, Cowden syndrome or Bannayan-Riley-Ruvalcaba syndrome or a first-degree relative with one of these syndromes; or(6) extremely dense breast tissue based on breast composition categories.Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as to preclude utilization review as provided under Article XXI of this act or to prevent the application of deductible, copayment or coinsurance provisions contained in the policy or plan for breast imaging in excess of the minimum coverage required.* * *(d) As used in this section:[(C) THIS SECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO THE FOLLOWING TYPES OF POLICIES:(1) ACCIDENT ONLY.(2) LIMITED BENEFIT.(3) CREDIT.(4) DENTAL.(5) VISION.(6) SPECIFIED DISEASE.(7) MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT.(8) CIVILIAN HEALTH AND MEDICAL PROGRAM OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES (CHAMPUS) SUPPLEMENT.(9) LONG-TERM CARE OR DISABILITY INCOME.(10) WORKERS' COMPENSATION.20250HB0433PN1300 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) AUTOMOBILE MEDICAL PAYMENT.(12) FIXED INDEMNITY.(13) HOSPITAL INDEMNITY.](D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2), THE TERMS IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE GIVEN THE SAME MEANING AS IN SECTION 2102 OF THIS ACT.(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION[:] THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS PARAGRAPH UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ALL COSTS" MEANS ALL DEDUCTIBLES, COINSURANCE, COPAYMENTS OR SIMILAR OUT-OF-POCKET EXPENSES PAID OUT-OF-POCKET BY THE INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING A SERVICE."Diagnostic breast examination" means a medically necessary and clinically appropriate examination of the breast using diagnostic mammography, EITHER STANDARD OR ABBREVIATED breast magnetic resonance imaging or breast ultrasound when there is an abnormality seen or suspected."Supplemental breast screening" means a medically necessary and clinically appropriate examination of the breast using either standard or abbreviated magnetic resonance imaging or, if such imaging is not possible, ultrasound if recommended by the treating physician to screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or suspected in the breast.SECTION 2. THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 632 OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY AS FOLLOWS:(1) FOR HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES FOR WHICH EITHER RATES OR FORMS ARE REQUIRED TO BE FILED WITH THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT, THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 632 OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO ANY POLICY FOR WHICH A FORM OR RATE IS FIRST FILED ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.20250HB0433PN1300 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) FOR HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES FOR WHICH NEITHER RATES NOR FORMS ARE REQUIRED TO BE FILED WITH THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT, THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 632 OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO ANY POLICY ISSUED OR RENEWED ON OR AFTER 180 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0433PN1300 - 6 - <--1234567